Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1205
Applicable codes, defined.

Applicable codes means uniform building, fire, safety, electrical, plumbing, or mechanical codes adopted by a recognized national code organization or local amendments to such codes so long as such amendments are not in conflict with the Small Wireless Facilities Deployment Act and to the extent such codes have been adopted by the authority and are generally applicable in the jurisdiction.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 5.